Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.115.140

Transfer of program administration.

After consulting with the office, the governor may transfer the administration of this program to another agency with an appropriate mission.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 213; 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 722. Formerly RCW 18.150.070.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.